Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 16 Landlord and Tenant
18-16-407. Sale and removal procedure.

(a)

Before conducting a sale or removal of personal property under §18-16-406, the operator shall:

(1)(A)

Notify the occupant in writing of the default.

(B)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section, notice shall be sent by first class mail with certificate of mailing to the occupant at the occupant's last known address.

(C)

The notice shall include:

(i)

A statement that the contents of the occupant's leased space are subject to the operator's lien;

(ii)

A statement of the operator's claim, indicating the charges due on the date of the notice, the amount of any additional charges that shall become due before the date of sale, and the date the additional charges shall become due;

(iii)

A demand for payment of the charges due within a specified time, not less than fourteen (14) days after the date that the notice is sent;

(iv)

A statement that unless the claim is paid within the time stated, the contents of the occupant's space will be sold at a specified time and place or removed from the self-service storage facility on a specified date;

(v)

The name, street address, and telephone number of the operator or his or her designated agent whom the occupant may contact to respond to the notice; and

(vi)

Designation of the date, time, and place where the contents will be sold or removed from the self-service storage facility unless the default is remedied before the sale or removal of the personal property.

(D)

If an occupant provides an electronic mail address and gives permission to the storage facility to use the electronic mail address as a legal notification for the occupant's last known address, then the operator may use the electronic mail address to send the notice required by subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section instead of sending the notice by first class mail with certificate of mailing;

(2)

Publish one (1) advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the storage facility is located at least seven (7) days before the sale or removal of personal property; and

(3)(A)

Contact the circuit clerk in the county where the personal property is stored to determine the name and address of any holder of liens or security interests in the personal property being sold or removed.

(B)(i)

The operator shall notify by first class mail with certificate of mailing each holder of a lien or security interest of the time and place of the proposed sale or removal of the personal property at least ten (10) days before conducting the sale or removing the personal property.

(ii)

The operator shall be required to notify the holder of a lien or security interest only if the lien or security interest is filed under the name of the occupant.

(b)

At any time before a sale or removal of personal property under this section, the occupant may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the operator's lien and redeem the occupant's personal property.

(c)

The sale under this subchapter shall be held at the self-service storage facility where the personal property is stored.

(d)

A purchaser in good faith of any personal property sold under this subchapter takes the property free and clear of any rights of:

(1)

Persons against whom the lien was valid; and

(2)

Other lienholders.

(e)

If the operator complies with the provisions of this subchapter, the operator's liability:

(1)

To the occupant shall be limited to the net proceeds received from the sale of the personal property; and

(2)

To other lienholders shall be limited to the net proceeds received from the sale of any personal property covered by the other liens or the amount owed to such lienholders, whichever is less.

(f)

The operator shall retain a copy of all notices and return receipts required by subsection (a) of this section for six (6) months following the date of the lien sale or removal of the personal property from the self-service storage facility.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 576, § 4; 2011, No. 189, § 1; 2013, No. 364, § 2; 2015, No. 348, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “first class mail with certificate of mailing” for “certified mail, return receipt requested” in (a)(1) and (a)(3)(B)(i); and subdivided former (a)(3)(B) as present (a)(3)(B)(i) and (a)(3)(B)(ii).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and removal” in the section heading; inserted “or removal of personal property” in the introductory language of (a); inserted similar references to removal of personal property throughout the section; and changed the reference in (a)(1)(B) from “(2)(D)” to “(a)(1)(D)”.

18-16-408. Disposition of sale proceeds.

(a)

Proceeds from the sale shall be applied to satisfy the lien, and any surplus shall be disbursed as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

If a sale is held under this subchapter, the operator shall:

(1)

Satisfy the lien from the proceeds of the sale; and

(2)

Hold the balance, if any, for delivery on demand to the occupant or any other recorded lienholders. If demand is not made within two (2) years after the date of the sale, the surplus shall escheat to the county.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 576, § 4.

18-16-409. Notices — Method of delivery.

(a)

Unless otherwise specifically provided, all notices required by this subchapter shall be sent by first class mail with certificate of mailing.

(b)(1)

Notices sent to the operator shall be sent to the self-service storage facility where the occupant's property is stored.

(2)

Notices to the occupant shall be sent to the occupant at the occupant's last known address.

(3)

Notices shall be deemed delivered when deposited with the United States Postal Service, properly addressed as provided in §18-16-407(a) with postage prepaid.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 576, § 4; 2011, No. 189, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “first class mail with certificate of mailing” for “certified mail, return receipt requested” in (a).

18-16-410. Limits on value of stored property.

If the rental agreement contains a specified limit on the value of property allowed to be stored in an occupant's storage space, the operator is not liable for a loss or damages to the property stored in the occupant's storage space that exceeds the specified limit.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 364, § 3.

18-16-411. Conditions and limitations for imposing late fees.

(a)

If the amount of a late fee and the conditions for imposing a late fee are stated in the rental agreement or in an addendum to the rental agreement, the operator may impose a late fee on the occupant for each month the occupant does not pay rent when due that does not exceed the greater of:

(1)

Thirty dollars ($30.00) per month; or

(2)

Twenty percent (20%) of the amount of monthly rent.

(b)

Expenses incurred as a result of rent collection or lien enforcement by an operator may be charged to the occupant in addition to the late fees permitted by this section.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 364, § 3.

18-16-412. Disposal of personal information — Definition.

(a)(1)

As used in this section, “personal information” means information relating to a client, a customer, or a person with whom the occupant does business that readily identifies that person or is closely associated with the person, including without limitation a person's:

(A)

Social Security number;

(B)

Credit or debit card information;

(C)

Bank account number;

(D)

Medical information; or

(E)

Passport information.

(2)

“Personal information” does not include information that readily identifies or is closely associated with the occupant of the leased self-service storage space.

(b)

If the operator has a reasonable belief that the leased self-service storage space contains personal information relating to clients, customers, or others with whom the occupant does business, the operator may, after an occupant is in default for a period of more than forty-five (45) days, inspect the contents of a leased self-service storage space to investigate for the presence of personal information without any liability to the occupant or any other person who claims an interest in the personal information.

(c)

The operator:

(1)

Shall not sell the personal information under §18-16-406; and

(2)

Shall destroy the personal information.

(d)

An operator who complies with subsections (b) and (c) of this section is not liable to the occupant or any other person who claims an interest in the personal information.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 628, § 1.

18-16-413. Sale of a vehicle.

A self-service storage facility may sell a vehicle of a type subject to registration under the laws of this state using the procedure for the sale of a vehicle as provided in §§27-50-1202 and27-50-1208 —27-50-1210.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 738, § 1.

Subchapter 5

— Tenant Liability — Eviction

Publisher's Notes.

A former subchapter 5, concerning tenant liability and eviction, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 1004, § 12. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

18-16-501. Acts 2001, No. 1758, § 1.

18-16-502. Acts 2001, No. 1758, § 2.

18-16-503. Acts 2001, No. 1758, § 3.

18-16-504. Acts 2001, No. 1758, § 4.

18-16-505. Acts 2001, No. 1758, § 5.

18-16-506. Acts 2001, No. 1758, § 6.

18-16-507. Acts 2001, No. 1758, § 7.

18-16-508. Acts 2001, No. 1758, § 8.

18-16-501. Common nuisance — Criminal offense.

Any tenant who uses or allows another person to use the tenant's leased premises as a common nuisance as defined by §5-74-109(b) or §16-105-402 or for a criminal offense as identified in §18-16-502 may be evicted by the prosecuting attorney of the county, the city attorney of the city, the landlord, the premises owner, or the agent for the premises owner pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 464, § 1.

18-16-502. Gambling — Prostitution — Alcohol.

For purposes of this subchapter, any tenant who engages in or allows another person to engage in illegal gambling under §5-66-107, prostitution as defined by §5-70-102, or the unlawful sale of alcohol as defined by §3-3-205 on the tenant's leased premises shall be subject to the eviction procedures established by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 464, § 1.

18-16-503. Complaint — Jurisdiction — Definition.

(a)

The prosecuting attorney of the county, the city attorney of the city, the landlord, the premises owner, or the agent for the premises owner may file a complaint in the office of the clerk of the court for the eviction of any tenant who has used or has allowed another person to use the tenant's leased premises for use as a common nuisance as defined by §5-74-109(b) or §16-105-402 or for a criminal offense as identified in §18-16-502.

(b)

A civil action under this subchapter is cognizable before the:

(1)

Circuit court of any county in which an act described in §18-16-501 or §18-16-502 is committed; and

(2)

District court with jurisdiction concurrent with the jurisdiction of the circuit court if permitted by rule or order of the Supreme Court.

(c)

As used in this subchapter, “court” means:

(1)

A circuit court; and

(2)

If permitted by rule or order of the Supreme Court, a district court.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 464, § 1.

18-16-504. Form of complaint.

A complaint filed under this subchapter shall state the name of the tenant or tenants to be evicted, the location of the leased premises, and the basis for which eviction is authorized under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 464, § 1.

18-16-505. Summons — Notice.

Upon the filing of a complaint under this subchapter, the clerk of the court shall issue a summons upon the complaint. The summons shall be in customary form directed to the sheriff of the county where the complaint is filed, with direction for service of the complaint on the named defendants. In addition, the court shall issue and direct the sheriff to serve upon the named defendants a notice in the following form:

“NOTICE OF INTENTION TO EVICT FOR CRIMINAL ACTIVITY You are hereby notified that the attached complaint in the above-styled cause claims that you have engaged in or have allowed the property described in the above-mentioned complaint to be used for criminal activity and that the plaintiff is entitled to have you evicted pursuant to state law. If, within five (5) days, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, after the date of service of this notice you have not filed in the office of the clerk of this court a written objection to the claims made against you by the plaintiff in his or her complaint for eviction, then a writ of possession shall forthwith issue from this office directed to the sheriff of this county or to the police chief of the city ordering him or her to remove you from possession of the property described in the complaint. If you should file a written objection to the complaint of the plaintiff and the allegations for immediate possession of the property described in the complaint within five (5) days, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, after the date of service of this notice, a hearing will be scheduled by the court after you have timely answered to determine whether or not the writ of possession should issue as sought by the plaintiff. Clerk of Court”

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 464, § 1.

18-16-506. Written objection.

(a)

If within five (5) days, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, following service of this summons, complaint, and notice seeking a writ of possession against the defendants named in the complaint the defendant or defendants have not filed a written objection to the claim for a writ of possession made by the plaintiff in his or her complaint, the clerk of the court shall immediately issue a writ of possession directed to the sheriff of the county or the police chief of the city commanding him or her to cause the defendant or defendants to vacate the property described in the complaint without delay, which the sheriff or police chief shall execute in the manner described in §18-16-507.

(b)(1)

If a written objection to the claim of the plaintiff for a writ of possession is filed by the defendant or defendants within five (5) days after the date of service of the notice, summons, and complaint as provided for in this section, the plaintiff shall obtain a date for the hearing of the plaintiff's demand for a writ of possession of the property described in the complaint after the defendant or defendants have timely answered the complaint.

(2)(A)

If a hearing described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section is required, at the hearing the plaintiff shall present evidence sufficient to make a prima facie case of the criminal activity that has been facilitated at the property described in the complaint.

(B)

The defendant or defendants shall be entitled to present evidence in rebuttal of the plaintiff's case.

(3)

If the court decides upon all the evidence that the plaintiff is entitled to a writ of possession under state law, then the court shall order the clerk of the court to immediately issue a writ of possession to the sheriff of the county or the police chief of the city to evict the defendant or defendants, as provided for in §18-16-507.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 464, § 1.

18-16-507. Writ of possession — Definition.

(a)

Upon receipt of a writ of possession from the clerk of the court, the sheriff or police chief shall immediately proceed to execute the writ of possession in the specific manner described in this section and, if necessary, ultimately by ejecting from the property described in the writ of possession the defendant or defendants and any other person or persons who have unlawfully received or entered into the possession of the property after the issuance of the writ of possession, and then notify the plaintiff that the property has been vacated by the defendant or defendants.

(b)(1)

Upon receipt of the writ of possession, the sheriff or police chief shall notify the defendant or defendants of the issuance of the writ of possession by delivering a copy of the writ of possession to the defendant or defendants or to any person authorized to receive summons in civil cases and in like manner.

(2)

If within eight (8) hours after receipt of the writ of possession the sheriff or police chief does not find any such defendant as stated in the complaint at his or her normal place of residence, the sheriff or police chief may serve the writ of possession by placing a copy conspicuously upon the front door or other structure of the property described in the complaint, which shall have like effect as if delivered in person pursuant to the terms of the writ of possession.

(c)(1)(A)

If at the expiration of twenty-four (24) hours after the service of the writ of possession in the manner indicated the defendant or defendants remain in possession of the property, the sheriff or police chief shall notify the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney of that fact and may employ, may engage, and shall be provided with all labor and assistance required by the sheriff or police chief to obtain possession and remove the possessions and belongings of the defendant or defendants from the affected property to a place of storage in a public warehouse or in some other reasonable safe place of storage under the control of the plaintiff.

(B)(i)

The defendant or defendants may recover the property stored under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section within seven (7) business days.

(ii)

Before recovering the property, the defendant or defendants shall pay for the reasonable cost of storage.

(2)

If the defendant or defendants do not recover the property as provided in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, then the court shall order the possessions and belongings of the defendant or defendants sold by the plaintiff in a commercially reasonable manner with the proceeds of the sale applied first to the cost of storage, second to any monetary judgment in favor of the plaintiff, and third to the defendant any excess.

(d)

In executing the writ of possession, the sheriff or police chief may forcibly remove all locks or other barriers erected to prevent entry upon the premises in any manner which he or she deems appropriate or convenient and, if necessary, physically restrain the defendant or defendants from interfering with the removal of a defendant's property and possessions from the property described in the writ of possession.

(e)

If the plaintiff is the city attorney or prosecuting attorney, no bond shall be required. If the plaintiff is the landlord or premises owner, no bond shall be required unless ordered by the court as a condition to the execution of a writ of possession granted prior to the date that an answer is to be filed by the defendant or defendants.

(f)

The sheriff or police chief shall return the writ of possession at or before the return date of the writ of possession and shall state in his or her return the manner in which he or she executed the writ of possession and whether or not the defendant or defendants have been ejected from the property described and, if not, the reason for the failure of the sheriff or police chief to do so.

(g)

As used in this section, “sheriff or police chief” includes a deputy sheriff, police officer, or other law enforcement official acting at the direction of the sheriff or police chief.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 464, § 1.

18-16-508. Costs and attorney's fees — Damages.

(a)(1)

A court granting relief under this subchapter may order in addition to any other costs provided by law the payment by the defendant or defendants to the plaintiff reasonable attorney's fees and the costs of the action. In such cases, multiple defendants are jointly and severally liable for any payment so ordered.

(2)

Any costs or attorney's fees collected from the defendants shall be remitted to the plaintiff. If the plaintiff is the city attorney, the costs shall be remitted to the city general fund. If the plaintiff is the prosecuting attorney, the costs shall be remitted to the county general fund.

(b)

A proceeding brought under this subchapter for eviction of the defendants and occupants of the premises does not preclude the owner or landlord from recovering monetary damages for rent, repairs, or any other incidental damages up to the date of eviction of the defendants and occupants from the premises in a civil action.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 464, § 1.

18-16-509. Immunity from civil liability.

For any action or threatened action taken to enforce a right or remedy provided by this subchapter, a landlord, a premises owner, an agent or attorney for the premises owner, and a real estate licensee as defined in §17-42-103 are immune from civil liability for the breach of an express or implied covenant concerning the possession or quiet enjoyment of the leased premises.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 464, § 1.